Utah statutes.
16-6a-611.   No property right.

A member does not have any vested property right including any right relating to management, control, purpose, or duration of the nonprofit corporation, except as provided by:

(1)  the bylaws of a mutual benefit corporation; or

(2)  other law.



Amended by Chapter 315, 2007 General Session

